California statutes. Education Code
(c) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall incorporate the textbooks and instructional materials on the list described in subdivision (a) into the implementation element of the history-social science framework adopted by the State Board of Education in July 1987, and into the implementation element of the framework adopted by the State Board of Education for any other subject area for which those textbooks and instructional materials identify important minority roles and contributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 452, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

51226.6.

(a) The State Department of Education shall develop and adopt a model curriculum framework for driver education and training that incorporates the rules and regulations adopted by the State Board of Education relating to driver education pursuant to Sections 41905 and 51850, and that is directed to preparing student drivers for compliance with paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 12814.6 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) The State Department of Education shall not be required to comply with the requirements of subdivision (a) unless federal funding is available to defray the cost of developing and adopting the model curriculum framework for driver training and education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 760, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

51226.7.

(a) The Instructional Quality Commission shall develop, and the state board shall adopt, modify, or revise, a model curriculum in ethnic studies to ensure quality courses of study in ethnic studies. The model curriculum shall be developed with participation from faculty of ethnic studies programs at universities and colleges with ethnic studies programs and a group of representatives of local educational agencies, a majority of whom are kindergarten to grade 12, inclusive, teachers who have relevant experience or education background in the study and teaching of ethnic studies.

(b) The model curriculum shall be written as a guide to allow school districts to adapt their courses
 to reflect the pupil demographics in their communities. The model curriculum shall
 include examples of courses offered by local educational agencies that have been approved as meeting the A–G admissions requirements of the University of California and the California State University, including, to the extent possible, course outlines for those courses.

(c) On or before December 31, 2020, the Instructional Quality Commission shall submit the model curriculum to the state board for adoption, and the state board shall adopt the model curriculum on or before March 31, 2021.

(d) The Instructional Quality Commission shall provide a minimum of 45 days for public comment before submitting the model curriculum to the state board.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational
 agencies submit course outlines for ethnic studies for approval as A–G courses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 661, Sec. 3.   (AB 101)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

51226.8.

(a) The Instructional Quality Commission shall develop and recommend to the state board, for consideration and adoption by the state board, a curriculum guide and resources for a separate, stand-alone one-semester course in personal finance, that is not combined with any other course. On or before May 31, 2026, the state board shall adopt a curriculum guide and resources for a separate, stand-alone one-semester course in personal finance based on the Instructional Quality Commission’s recommendation. The curriculum guide and resources shall include all of, and only, the personal finance content specified in paragraphs (1) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 51284.5.

(b) In the event that the state board has not adopted a curriculum guide and
 resources for a separate, stand-alone one-semester course in personal finance as of May 31, 2026, local educational agencies, including charter schools, shall locally develop the curriculum and resources to offer a separate, stand-alone one-semester course in personal finance meeting the requirements of clause (v) of subparagraph (H) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3 for approval by the governing board or body of the local educational agency, in order to meet the requirement to offer the separate, stand-alone one-semester course in personal finance as of the 2027–28 school year described in clause (iv) of subparagraph (H) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3.

(c) The sum of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Instructional Quality Commission for purposes of carrying out the duties required under subdivision (a).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 51225.32 (as added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 37, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 57.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

51226.9.

(a) (1) The department shall, no later than June 1, 2022, in collaboration with, and subject to the approval of, the executive director of the state board, use the funding appropriated pursuant to Section 156 of Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021 to enter into a contract with a county office of education or a consortium of county offices of education for the purposes of developing a model curriculum related to Native American studies by September 1, 2025. The model curriculum shall be housed on the platform developed and maintained by the California History-Social Science Project. The designated county office of education or consortium of county offices of education shall work with the California History-Social Science Project and Teaching California to ensure that the model curriculum is accessible and
 compatible with the platform.

(2) The county office of education or consortium of county offices of education shall ensure the inclusion of authentic voices and perspectives in the development of the model curriculum and shall provide multiple opportunities for authentic stakeholder engagement across the state which shall include, but not be limited to, town halls or other input sessions and surveys. The county office of education or consortium of county offices of education shall consult with federally recognized Native American tribes located in California, California Native American tribes, faculty of Native American studies programs at universities and colleges with Native American studies programs, representatives of local educational agencies, members of the Instructional Quality Commission established pursuant to Section 33530, and teachers, including teachers who have relevant experiences or education backgrounds in the study and
 teaching of Native American studies. The Governor’s Tribal Advisor, the Native American Heritage Commission, and the department shall assist the county office of education or consortium of county offices of education in statewide tribal consultations with federally recognized Native American tribes located in California and California Native American tribes.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “California Native American tribe” means a Native American tribe that is on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission for the purposes of Chapter 905 of the Statutes of 2004 and Chapter 532 of the Statutes of 2014.

(b) The model curriculum shall be written as a guide to allow school districts and charter schools to adapt their related courses to reflect the pupil demographics in their communities. The model curriculum shall include examples of courses offered
 by local educational agencies that have been approved as meeting the A–G admissions requirements of the University of California and the California State University, including, to the extent possible, course outlines for those courses.

(c) The model curriculum shall be open source and accessible to educators across the state and include online instructional modules appropriate for use in elementary, middle, and high schools.

(d) The county office of education or consortium of county offices of education may subcontract with a nonprofit organization or institution of higher education in the development of the model curriculum pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) The county office of consortium or county offices of education shall submit a report annually, until the completion of the model curriculum, on its progress in
 the development of the model curriculum to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature and to the state board.

(f) Beginning in the school year following the completion of the model curriculum pursuant to subdivision (a), each school district or charter school maintaining any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, that does not otherwise offer a standards-based Native American studies curriculum is encouraged to offer to all otherwise qualified pupils a course of study in Native American studies. A school district or charter school that elects to offer a course of study in Native American studies pursuant to this subdivision shall offer the course as an elective in the social sciences or English language arts and shall make the course available in at least one year during a pupil’s enrollment in grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that
 local educational agencies submit course outlines for Native American studies for approval as A–G courses.

(h) For purposes of this section, “model curriculum” means lesson plans, primary source documents, planning resources, teaching strategies, and professional development activities to assist teachers in teaching about Native American studies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 252, Sec. 27.   (AB 167)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

51227.3.

(a) The Instructional Quality Commission shall ensure that the environmental principles and concepts developed pursuant to Section 71301 of the Public Resources Code are integrated into the content standards and curriculum frameworks in the subjects of English language arts, science, history-social science, health, and, to the extent practicable, mathematics whenever those standards and frameworks are revised.

(b) The environmental principles and concepts shall be incorporated, as the state board determines to be appropriate, in the criteria developed for textbook adoption required pursuant to Section 60200 or 60400.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 374, Sec. 4.   (SB 720)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

51228.

(a) Each school district maintaining any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, shall offer to all otherwise qualified pupils in those grades a course of study fulfilling the requirements and prerequisites for admission to the California public institutions of postsecondary education and shall provide a timely opportunity to each of those pupils to enroll within a four-year period in each course necessary to fulfill those requirements and prerequisites prior to graduation from high school.

(b) Each school district maintaining any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, shall offer to all otherwise qualified pupils in those grades a course of study that provides an opportunity for those pupils to attain entry-level employment skills in business or industry upon graduation from high school. Districts are encouraged to provide all pupils with a rigorous academic curriculum that integrates academic and career skills, incorporates applied learning in all disciplines, and prepares all pupils for high school graduation and career entry.

(c) A school district that adopts a required curriculum that meets or exceeds the model standards developed and adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 51226 shall be deemed to have fulfilled its responsibilities pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) A school district that adopts a required curriculum pursuant to subdivision (c) that meets or exceeds the model standards developed by the state board pursuant to Section 51226, or that adopts alternative means for pupils to complete the prescribed course of study pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 51225.3, may substitute pupil demonstration of competence in the prescribed subjects through a practical demonstration of these skills in a regional occupational center or program, work experience, interdisciplinary study, independent study, credit earned at a postsecondary institution, or other outside school experience, as prescribed by Section 51225.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

51228.1.

(a) Commencing with the 2016–17 school year, except as provided in subdivision (e), a school district maintaining any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, shall not assign a pupil enrolled in any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, in a school in the school district to any course period without educational content for more than one week in any semester, unless all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) A
 pupil is assigned to that course only if the pupil or, for a pupil who has not reached the age of majority, the pupil’s parent, guardian, or educational rights holder has consented in writing to the assignment.

(2) A school official has determined that the pupil will benefit from being assigned to the course period.

(3) The principal or assistant principal of the school has stated in a written document maintained at the school that, for the relevant school year, no pupils are assigned to those classes unless the school has met the conditions specified in paragraphs (1) and (2).

(b) Under no circumstances shall a school district assign
 a pupil enrolled in any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, in a school in the school district to a course period without educational content because there are not sufficient curricular course offerings for the pupil to take during the relevant period of the designated schoolday.

(c) For purposes of this section, “course period without educational content” is defined as one course period during which
 any of the following occurs:

(1) The pupil is sent home or released from campus before the conclusion of the designated schoolday.

(2) The pupil is assigned to a service, instructional work experience, or to an otherwise named course in which the pupil is assigned to assist a certificated employee, but not expected to complete curricular assignments, in a course the certificated employee is teaching during that period and where the ratio of certificated employees to pupils assigned to the course for curricular purposes is less than one to one.

(3) The pupil is not assigned to any course for the relevant course period.

(d) Nothing in
 this section shall be interpreted to limit or otherwise affect the authority of a school district to authorize dual enrollment in community college, as provided for in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 48800) of Part 27, to establish and maintain evening high school programs, as provided for in Article 3 (commencing with Section 51720) of Chapter 5, to offer
 independent study, as provided for in Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 51745) of Chapter 5, to provide courses of work-based learning or work experience education, as provided for in Article 7 (commencing with Section 51760) of Chapter 5, or to offer any class or course of instruction authorized under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 51700), if the program otherwise meets all of the requirements of law governing that program.

(e) This section shall not apply to a pupil enrolled in any of the following:

(1) An alternative school.

(2) A community day school.

(3) A continuation high school.

(4) An opportunity school.

(f) The Superintendent shall develop regulations for adoption by the state board to establish procedures governing this section, including the form of the written statement required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 703, Sec. 1.   (AB 1012)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

51228.2.

(a) Commencing with the 2016–17 school year, except as provided in subdivision (d), a school district maintaining any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, shall not assign a pupil enrolled in any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, in a school in the school district to a course that the pupil has previously completed and received a grade determined by the school district to be sufficient to satisfy the requirements and prerequisites for admission to the California public
 institutions of postsecondary education and the minimum requirements for receiving a diploma of graduation from high school established in this article, unless either of the following applies:

(1) The course has been designed to be taken more than once because pupils are exposed to a new curriculum year to year and are therefore expected to derive educational value from taking the course again.

(2) For any course that has not been designed to be taken more than once, all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) A pupil is assigned to the course only if the pupil or, for a pupil who has not reached the age of majority, the pupil’s parent, guardian, or educational rights holder has consented in
 writing to the assignment for the purpose of improving a lower grade.

(B) A school official has determined that the pupil will benefit from being assigned to the course period.

(C) The principal or assistant principal of the school has stated in a written document to be maintained at the school that, for the relevant school year, no pupils are assigned to those classes unless the school has met the conditions specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B).

(b) Under no circumstances shall a school district assign a pupil enrolled in
 any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, in a school in the school district to a course that the pupil has previously completed and received a grade determined by the school district to be sufficient to satisfy the requirements and prerequisites for admission to the California public institutions of postsecondary education and the minimum requirements for receiving a diploma of graduation from high school established in this article because there are not sufficient curricular course offerings for the pupil to take during the relevant period of the designated schoolday.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to limit or otherwise affect the authority of a school district to authorize dual enrollment in community college, as provided for in Chapter 5
 (commencing with Section 48800) of Part 27, to establish and maintain evening high school programs, as provided for in Article 3 (commencing with Section 51720) of Chapter 5, to offer independent study, as provided for in Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 51745) of Chapter 5, to provide courses of work-based learning or work experience education, as provided for in Article 7 (commencing with Section 51760) of Chapter 5, or to offer any class or course of instruction authorized under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 51700), if the program otherwise meets all of the requirements of law governing that program.

(d) This section shall not apply to a pupil enrolled in any of the following:

(1) An alternative school.

(2) A community day school.

(3) A continuation high school.

(4) An opportunity school.

(e) The Superintendent shall develop regulations for adoption by the state board to establish procedures governing this section, including the form of the written statement required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 703, Sec. 2.   (AB 1012)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

51228.3.

(a) A complaint of noncompliance with the requirements of Section 51228.1 or 51228.2 may be filed with the local educational agency under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a local educational agency may appeal the decision to the department pursuant to the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, and shall receive a decision regarding the appeal within 60 days of the department’s receipt of
 the appeal.

(c) If a local educational agency finds merit in a complaint filed pursuant to subdivision (a), or the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal made pursuant to subdivision (b), the local educational agency shall provide a remedy to the affected pupil.

(d) The Superintendent shall prepare an annual report detailing actions taken pursuant to this section. By January 1 of each year, the Superintendent shall submit the report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature.

(e) The Superintendent shall have all power and authority necessary to effectuate the requirements of this section. The Superintendent shall develop regulations for adoption by the state board that set forth
 the procedures governing this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 703, Sec. 3.   (AB 1012)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

51229.

(a) Each school year, as part of the annual notification required pursuant to Section 48980, a school district offering any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, shall provide the parent or guardian of each minor pupil enrolled in any of those grades in the district with written notification that, to the extent possible, shall not exceed one page in length and that includes all of the following:

(1) A brief explanation of the college admission requirements.

(2) A list of the current University of California and California State University internet websites that help pupils and their families learn about college admission requirements and that list high school courses
 that have been certified by the University of California as satisfying the requirements for admission to the University of California and the California State University.

(3) A brief description of what career technical education is, as defined by the department.

(4) The internet address for the portion of the department’s internet website where pupils can learn more about career technical education.

(5) Information about how pupils may meet with school counselors to help them choose courses at their schools that will meet college admission requirements or enroll in career technical education courses, or both.

(6) A separate and distinct disclosure, provided as part of the school district’s annual parent notification, as required by the federal Family
 Education Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g), that data may be shared with the California College Guidance Initiative to provide pupils and their families with direct access to online tools and resources for college and career planning.

(7) Direction to the CaliforniaColleges.edu platform in order to access resources that help pupils and their families learn about college admissions requirements.

(b) For purposes of this section, “college admission requirements” means the list of courses that satisfy the subject requirements for admission to the California State University and the University of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 64.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

51230.

(a) If the governing board of a school district requires the completion of community service hours as a requirement for graduation from high school, the school district may provide a pupil with credit towards the community service hours required for graduation
 commensurate with the hours required for completion of a course in community emergency response training.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not exempt the governing board of a school district from complying with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 51225.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 70, Sec. 1.   (AB 1062)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Exemptions from Requirements [51240. - 51246.]

51240.

(a) If any part of a school’s instruction in health conflicts with the religious training and beliefs of a parent or guardian of a pupil, the pupil, upon written request of the parent or guardian, shall be excused from the part of the instruction that conflicts with the religious training and beliefs.

(b) For purposes of this section, “religious training and beliefs” includes personal moral convictions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 896, Sec. 49.   Effective September 29, 2004.   Note: Similar provisions were in the previous Section 51240, which was enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010, and repealed by Stats. 2003, Ch. 650.)
-------------------------------------------

51240.5.

(a) A pupil in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, shall be granted an accommodation in connection with any physical activity components of a physical education course during a period of religious fasting upon the submission to the school principal of written notification from the pupil’s parent or guardian, if the pupil is less than 18 years of age, or from the pupil, if the pupil is 18 years of age or older, that the pupil is participating in religious fasting.

(b) For purposes of
 calculating compliance with the instructional time requirements of paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 51210, subdivision (a) of Section 51222, and subdivision (a) of Section 51223, a pupil shall be credited with instructional time for any time for which the pupil was granted an accommodation in connection with engaging in physical activity components pursuant to this section, upon completion of alternative assignments or activities by the pupil.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 960, Sec. 1.   (AB 2377)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

51241.

(a) The governing board of a school district or the office of the county superintendent of schools of a county may grant a temporary exemption to a pupil from courses in physical education, if the pupil is one of the following:

(1) Ill or injured and a modified program to meet the needs of the pupil cannot be provided.

(2) Enrolled for one-half, or less, of the work normally required of full-time pupils.

(b) (1) The governing board of a school district or the office of the county superintendent of schools of a county, with the consent of a pupil, may grant a pupil an exemption
 from courses in physical education for two years anytime during grades 10 to 12, inclusive, if the pupil has met satisfactorily at least five of the six standards of the physical performance test administered in grade 9 pursuant to Section 60800.

(2) Pursuant to Sections 51210, 51220, and 51222, physical education is required to be offered to all pupils, and, therefore, schools are required to provide adequate facilities and instructional resources for that instruction. In this regard, paragraph (1) shall be implemented in a manner that does not create a new program or impose a higher level of service on a local educational agency. Paragraph (1) does not mandate any overall increase in staffing or instructional time because, pursuant to subdivision (d), pupils are not permitted to attend fewer total hours of class if they do not enroll in physical education. Paragraph (1) does not mandate any new costs because any additional physical education
 instruction that a local educational agency provides may be accomplished during the existing instructional day, with existing facilities. Paragraph (1) does not prevent a local educational agency from implementing any other temporary or permanent exemption authorized by this section.

(c) The governing board of a school district or the office of the county superintendent of a county may grant permanent exemption from courses in physical education if the pupil complies with any one of the following:

(1) Is 16 years of age or older and has been enrolled in grade 10 for one academic year or longer.

(2) Is enrolled as a postgraduate pupil.

(3) Is enrolled in a juvenile home, ranch, camp, or forestry camp school where pupils are scheduled for recreation and
 exercise pursuant to the requirements of Article 24 (commencing with Section 880) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) A pupil exempted under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall not attend fewer total hours of courses and classes if he or she elects not to enroll in a physical education course than he or she would have attended if he or she had elected to enroll in a physical education course.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board of a school district also may administer to pupils in grades 10 to 12, inclusive, the physical performance test required in grade 9 pursuant to Section 60800. A pupil who meets satisfactorily at least five of the six standards of this physical performance test in any of grades 10 to 12, inclusive, is eligible for an exemption pursuant to subdivision
 (b).

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 32) by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 56.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

51242.

The governing board of a school district may exempt any four-year or senior high school pupil from attending courses of physical education, if the pupil is engaged in a regular school-sponsored interscholastic athletic program carried on wholly or partially after regular school hours.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51243.

Credit shall be given for purposes of the course of study requirements prescribed by school district governing boards or other authorities having jurisdiction for grades 9 to 12, inclusive, to courses in world languages in private schools on the basis of their being at least equivalent to those that would be required for the pupil in a world language class in the same grade level in the public schools. The state board shall adopt rules and regulations prescribing standards and conditions pursuant to which credit shall be given for those purposes to pupils in the public schools who have successfully completed world language studies in private schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 19.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

51244.

The provisions of Section 51243 giving credit for world language courses given in private schools shall apply to courses in the following languages: Chinese, French, German, Greek (classical and modern), Hebrew (classical and modern), Italian, Japanese, Jewish, Latin, Spanish, and Russian, and other languages as the state board shall designate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 20.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

51245.

For purposes of the credit that may be given pursuant to Sections 51243 and 51244 for world language courses undertaken in private schools, it shall not be required that instructors in the private schools be regularly credentialed teachers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 21.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

51246.

The governing board of a school district may exempt any pupil enrolled in his last semester or quarter, as the case may be, of the 12th grade who, pursuant to Section 46145 or 46147, is permitted to attend school less than 240 or 180 minutes per day, from attending courses of physical education; provided, however, that such pupil may not be exempted pursuant to this section from attending courses of physical education if such pupil would, after such exemption, attend school for 240 minutes or more per day.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Schoolage Military Dependents [51250. - 51251.]

51250.

The department shall establish a formal liaison with the United States Department of Defense and school districts and county offices of education that enroll military dependents to do all of the following:

(a) Examine course credit transfer issues and establish guidelines for course credit transfer.

(b) Develop procedures to facilitate the integration of military dependents into new public schools.

(c) Establish procedures to assist military dependents in meeting local graduation requirements.

(d) Create model memorandums of agreement between military bases and school districts or county offices of education regarding enabling schoolage military dependents to experience a smoother transition from one school to another school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 608, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

51251.

(a) A governing board of a school district and a county office of education may undertake any or all of the following in order to properly address the needs of military dependents:

(1) Establish a course credit transfer policy for schoolage military dependents provided that, under the policy, the military dependents would still substantially meet the graduation requirements prescribed by the governing board. A school district may require a military dependent, within reason, to meet the graduation requirements of the district, established pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3, that are in addition to state graduation requirements.

(2) Provide early entry transfer, pretranscript evaluation, pupil support services, and other similar assistance to aid schoolage military dependents in meeting graduation requirements.

(b) A governing board of a school district may take the actions described in subdivision (a) if both of the following circumstances have been met:

(1) The parent or legal guardian of the military dependent is serving on active duty or has been discharged from military service within the last year.

(2) The transfer of the military dependent to a new school is the direct result of a military transfer or discharge of the parent or legal guardian of the dependent.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Early entry transfer” means that a pupil shall have completed the transfer process prior to arriving on the campus of the school to which the pupil is transferring and that upon arrival at the school to which the pupil is transferring, the pupil shall be able to attend his or her assigned classes and participate in his or her desired extracurricular activities, if the pupil meets the eligibility requirements for those activities.

(2) “Pretranscript evaluation” means that the school to which the pupil is transferring shall review the coursework-to-date of the pupil, including any unofficial transcripts, prior to the receipt of official transcripts or the arrival of the pupil. This evaluation process shall be designed to clarify any questions about the placement of the pupil in classes at the school to which the pupil is transferring and shall include communication with school counselors and teachers at the school from which the pupil is transferring by any or all of the following means: videoconferencing, e-mail correspondence, and telephone calls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.6. California Purple Star School Designation Program [51255. - 51255.]

51255.

(a) The department shall establish a nonmonetary California Purple Star School Designation Program pursuant to this article in order to achieve both of the following goals:

(1) Reduce the burden on military-connected pupils and their families by articulating the most critical transition supports for military-connected pupils and their families.

(2) Publicly recognize and designate schools that meet certain requirements and signal which schools are the most committed and best equipped to meet military-connected pupils and their families’ unique needs.

(b) (1) The department shall develop an application process that
 provides annual opportunities for schoolsites to earn the Purple Star School designation by demonstrating compliance with the application criteria adopted pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) The department shall adopt application criteria for schoolsites seeking the Purple Star School designation. The department shall consider including, as part of the application criteria, a requirement that a schoolsite do all of the following:

(A) Demonstrate an active status designation, as identified by the department on the department’s internet website.

(B) Designate a staff member to serve as a point of contact, who shall act as a liaison between military families and the schoolsite, easing military-connected pupils’ enrollment and acclimation period, and assist with pupils’ graduation requirements.

(C) Provide professional development opportunities to train staff on the unique considerations for, and needs of, military-connected pupils.

(D) Develop a dedicated webpage on the schoolsite’s internet website with easily accessible information and resources for military-connected families.

(E) Provide a transition program to welcome and socially acclimate incoming military-connected pupils. This transition program may be pupil led.

(F) Provide programming and events to include, celebrate, and honor service members and military-connected pupils and families, including community members.

(c) (1) Once a schoolsite is awarded a Purple Star School designation, it shall
 display its active status designation, as identified by the department, on the schoolsite’s internet website.

(2) A Purple Star School designation shall be valid for three years, after which a schoolsite seeking to renew its designation shall reapply pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) The department may request additional information to verify if a schoolsite that has earned a Purple Star School designation continues to adhere to the Purple Star School designation criteria adopted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(4) (A) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), if the department finds that a schoolsite that has earned a Purple Star School designation ceases to comply with the criteria adopted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) during the three-year designation period, the
 schoolsite shall lose the designation.

(B) A schoolsite that loses the designation pursuant to subparagraph (A) may reapply pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Military-connected pupil” means a schoolage child who is either of the following:

(A) A dependent of a current or former member of any of the following:

(i) The United States military, serving in the United States Air Force, United States Army, United States Coast Guard, United States Marine Corps, United States Navy, or United States Space Force on active duty.

(ii) The California National Guard.

(iii) A reserve force of the United States military.

(B) Was a dependent of a member of a military or reserve force described in subparagraph (A) who was killed in the line of duty.

(2) “Schoolsite” means a publicly funded school serving pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 58.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Drug Education [51260. - 51269.]

51260.
